Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1073
Motion for additional security; vacation.

A party enjoined may, at any time before judgment, upon reasonable notice to the party who has obtained the injunction, move the court for additional security; and if it appears that the surety in the undertaking has removed from the state, or is insufficient, the court may vacate the injunction, unless in a reasonable time sufficient security be given.

R.S.1867, Code § 261, p. 436;

R.S.1913, § 7802;

C.S.1922, § 8746;

C.S.1929, § 20-1073;

R.S.1943, § 25-1073.